trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="/være__vbser">
  <e>       <p><l>være</l>      <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>var</l>       <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vær</l>       <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>været</l>     <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>værende</l>   <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- PT: What's this?? Is this really needed?? Cannot be properly translated to Swedish.
<pardef n="/være__vblex"> Use this one for compound words
  <e>       <p><l>være</l>      <r>være<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>være<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>var</l>       <r>være<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vær</l>       <r>være<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>været</l>     <r>være<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>værende</l>   <r>være<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 -->
<pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vde</l>       <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>v</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vende</l>     <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tal/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hold/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sl/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oges</l>      <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ående</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ået</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tr/æffe__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æf</l>        <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æffe</l>      <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æffer</l>     <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æffes</l>     <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>af</l>        <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æffende</l>   <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uffet</l>     <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mal/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/inde__vblex">
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>inde</l>          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inde</l>         <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inder</l>        <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indes</l>        <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>andt</l>       <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>undet</l>        <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indende</l>      <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dan/ne__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nede</l>      <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nende</l>     <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="svøm/me__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mede</l>      <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mende</l>     <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bræk/ke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kede</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>     <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="være">            <i></i><par n="/være__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="være ligeglad">   <i></i><par n="/være__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ligeglad</l><r><g><b/>ligeglad</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="afplukke">        <i>afpluk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afsende">         <i>afsend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afspalte">        <i>afspalt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afvænne">         <i>afvæn</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="annamme">         <i>annam</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bagtale">         <i>bagtal</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bakke">           <i>bak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begrave">         <i>begrav</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="belønne">         <i>beløn</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beskinne">        <i>beskin</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beskæmme">        <i>beskæm</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betakke">         <i>betak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bortkalde">       <i>bortkald</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brumme">          <i>brum</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bræge">           <i>bræg</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brække">          <i>bræk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="danne">           <i>dan</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="duplikere">       <i>dupliker</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="finne">           <i>fin</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flamme">          <i>flam</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flække">          <i>flæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forfladige">      <i>forfladig</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forføre">         <i>forfør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forskønne">       <i>forskøn</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forstumme">       <i>forstum</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="føje">            <i>føj</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="genkalde">        <i>genkald</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="holde">           <i>hold</i><par n="hold/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="holde pause">     <i>hold</i><par n="hold/e__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pause</l><r><g><b/>pause</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="hæmme">           <i>hæm</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="høre">            <i>hør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inddrage">        <i>inddrag</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jamme">           <i>jam</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klikke">          <i>klik</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klunte">          <i>klunt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lønne">           <i>løn</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meddele">         <i>meddel</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nedrakke">        <i>nedrak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nedstamme">       <i>nedstam</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omdanne">         <i>omdan</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opflaske">        <i>opflask</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overhøre">        <i>overhør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sammenflikke">    <i>sammenflik</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skinne">          <i>skin</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skæmme">          <i>skæm</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slå">             <i>sl</i><par n="sl/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slagte">          <i>slagt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sluge">           <i>slug</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spække">          <i>spæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="svømme">          <i>svøm</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tildække">        <i>tildæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="træffe">          <i>tr</i><par n="tr/æffe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tænde">           <i>tænd</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uddanne">         <i>uddan</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="veje">            <i>vej</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vejlede">         <i>vejled</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vænne">           <i>væn</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="binde" a="MLO"><i>b</i><par n="b/inde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="være">            <i></i><par n="/være__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="have">            <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="foreslå">         <i>foresl</i><par n="sl/å__vblex"/></e>
